Louisiana, session 2026, SB301.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:600.112 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§600.112. Affordable housing
A. The following words and phrases, as used in this Section, unless a
different meaning is plainly required by the context, shall have the following
meanings:
(1) "Affordable housing" shall mean residential property that is housing
for rent or purchase by very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income
residents.
(2) "Affordable housing entity" shall mean a not-for-profit corporation,
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-634 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 301
other corporation, or government entity whose mission is to create or
rehabilitate housing for unhoused and very low-to-moderate income households,
individuals, seniors, and people with disabilities.
(3) "Deeply affordable housing" shall mean a residential unit that is set
aside for very low-income residents, and with a rental price that does not exceed
thirty percent of their income.
(4) "Very low-income resident" shall mean a resident whose income does
not exceed fifty percent of the median income for the state.
(5) "Low-income resident" shall mean a resident whose income does not
exceed eighty percent of the median income for the state.
(6) "Moderate-income resident" shall mean a resident whose income
does not exceed one hundred percent of the median income for the state.
(7) "Permanent supportive housing" shall mean affordable housing with
supportive services that help people who have experienced chronic
homelessness.
(8) "Surplus immovable property" shall mean immovable land or
property that has been retained by the Louisiana Housing Corporation in
accordance with the provisions of R.S. 41:140.
B. The Louisiana Housing Corporation shall maintain an inventory of
surplus state immovable property. The inventory shall be updated annually and
shall be posted on the publicly available Louisiana Housing Corporation
website.
C. Prior to its transfer or lease pursuant to the provisions of this Section,
the governor or his designee may determine that one or more items of surplus
immovable property are still required for use by the state. The governor or his
designee shall issue his reasons for withholding the property in a letter which
shall be made publicly available on the Louisiana Housing Corporation's
website.
D. Award of property pursuant to the provisions of this Section shall be
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-634 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 301
made at least once each year, if property is available.
E. In accordance with rules promulgated by the Louisiana Housing
Corporation, an affordable housing entity may submit a proposal to the
Louisiana Housing Corporation for the development of affordable housing on
any parcel listed on the surplus state immovable property. Proposals shall be
evaluated by the board of the Louisiana Housing Corporation and shall be
scored on a point system based on the following criteria:
(1) Inclusion of permanent supportive housing units.
(2) Proportion of deeply affordable units, as compared to other
proposals.
(3) Nonprofit, community land trust, or limited equity cooperative
ownership.
(4) Voluntary, on-site supportive services for persons with disabilities.
(5) Acceptance of tenant-based vouchers.
F. Upon choosing an affordable housing entity to develop a parcel of
surplus state immovable property, the Louisiana Housing Corporation shall:
(1) Notify the commissioner of administration of the total number of
properties to be conveyed, the number of affordable housing units proposed to
be produced, and the nature of developments approved.
(2) Enter into a cooperative endeavor agreement with the affordable
housing entity, in accordance with Article VII, Section 14(C) of the Constitution
of Louisiana. In exchange for rights in the parcel, the affordable housing entity
may provide development services, including procurement of construction
materials, that at a minimum are equal to the value of the parcel.
G. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
commissioner of administration shall be responsible to oversee the transfer of
property rights in the parcel by deed or lease to the affordable housing entity.
H. The Louisiana Housing Corporation shall submit to the legislature,
the governor or his designee, and the commissioner of administration, an annual
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-634 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 301
report no later than forty-five days prior to each regular session of the
legislature that includes the following information regarding parcels transferred
pursuant to this Section, collected since the last report:
(1) Inventory of parcels of surplus state immovable property transferred
to an affordable housing entity.
(2) Total number of properties conveyed.
(3) Inventory of developments approved by the Louisiana Housing
Corporation, including the nature of each development.
(4) Total number of affordable housing units proposed and completed.
Section 2. R.S. 41:140(B), (C), and (F) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§140. Sales of immovable property by state agencies
* * *
B. For any immovable property designated to be nonessential, the division
shall prepare a land management evaluation report setting forth recommendations
for the best use or disposition of the property. A copy of this report shall be filed
with the House Committee on Natural Resources and Environment and Senate
Committee on Natural Resources and delivered to the member of the House and
Senate in whose district the immovable property is located Louisiana Housing
Corporation.
C. Unless approval is received from the House Committee on Natural
Resources and Environment and Senate Committee on Natural Resources within
ninety days after receiving notice, the division shall not initiate implementation of
its recommendation for best use or disposition of the property. The Louisiana
Housing Corporation shall determine within ninety days of receipt of the report
submitted pursuant to Subsection B of this Section whether to retain the
nonessential property for disposition in accordance with R.S. 40:600.112. If the
Louisiana Housing Corporation does not retain the nonessential property, the
division shall initiate the implementation of its recommendation for best use or
Page 4 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-634 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 301
disposition of the property.
* * *
F. The division shall submit an annual report to the House Committee on
Natural Resources and Environment and Senate Committee on Natural Resources
legislature and the governor, detailing the amount of property it sold pursuant to
the provisions of this Section, the agencies from which such property came, the cost
of the sale, the net proceeds from such sale, and an updated inventory of immovable
property still belonging to the state and which agency possesses the property.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on July 1,
2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.